Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF33.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1077XS (2) 91 sc/ns S.F. 33 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 70A.23A Credit for accrued sick 1 leave ââ law enforcement officers. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âEligible law enforcement officerâ means a law enforcement 4 officer eligible to receive retirement benefits under an 5 eligible retirement system on or after July 1, 2025. 6 b. âEligible retirement systemâ means a retirement system 7 authorized under chapter 97B or 411. 8 c. âLaw enforcement officerâ means a law enforcement 9 officer, as defined in section 80B.3, who is not authorized to 10 receive credit for accrued sick leave as provided in section 11 70A.23. 12 2. An eligible law enforcement officer, excluding a law 13 enforcement officer covered under a collective bargaining 14 agreement which provides otherwise, who retires and has applied 15 for retirement benefits under an eligible retirement system, 16 or who dies while in active employment, shall be credited with 17 the number of accrued days of sick leave of the law enforcement 18 officer. The law enforcement officer, or the law enforcement 19 officerâs estate, shall receive a cash payment of the monetary 20 value of the officerâs accrued sick leave balance, not to 21 exceed two thousand dollars. The value of the officerâs 22 accrued sick leave balance shall be calculated by multiplying 23 the number of hours of accrued sick leave by the officerâs 24 regular hourly rate of pay at the time of retirement. 25 3. a. An eligible law enforcement officer, excluding an 26 officer covered under a collective bargaining agreement which 27 provides otherwise, who retires and receives a payment as 28 provided in subsection 2, shall be entitled to elect to have 29 the officerâs available remaining value of sick leave used to 30 pay the employerâs share for the officerâs continuation of 31 group health insurance coverage pursuant to the requirements 32 of this subsection. 33 b. An eligible law enforcement officerâs available 34 remaining value of sick leave shall be available to pay for 35 -1- LSB 1077XS (2) 91 sc/ns 1/ 3 S.F. 33 that portion of the officerâs group health insurance premium 1 that would otherwise be paid for by the employer if the 2 officer were still employed by the employer. The benefits 3 provided for in this subsection have no cash value and are 4 not transferable to any other person, including the retireeâs 5 spouse. Payment of group health insurance premiums pursuant 6 to this subsection continues until the earliest of when the 7 eligible law enforcement officerâs available remaining value 8 of sick leave is exhausted, the officer otherwise becomes 9 eligible for federal Medicare program benefits, or the officer 10 dies. In addition, a law enforcement officer electing benefits 11 pursuant to this subsection who is reinstated or reemployed in 12 a permanent full-time or permanent part-time position by the 13 law enforcement officerâs previous government employer forfeits 14 any remaining benefits for payment of group health insurance 15 benefits, and such law enforcement officer is not eligible for 16 restoration of the unused sick leave accrued during the law 17 enforcement officerâs prior employment with the employer. 18 Sec. 2. IMPLEMENTATION OF ACT. Section 25B.2, subsection 19 3, shall not apply to this Act. 20